California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
 established by regulations of the United States Department of Agriculture in Title 7 of Part 56 of the Code of Federal Regulations governing the grading of shell eggs.

(b) Retail outlets that are regulated by this chapter, except for retail outlets located in shell egg packing or distribution facilities, are exempt from subdivision (a).

(c) Direct marketing activities, including certified farmers’ markets, as defined in Section 113742 of the Health and Safety Code,
 community food producers, as defined in Section 113752 of the Health and Safety Code, community-supported agriculture, as defined in Section 47060, and farm stands, as defined in Section 47050, are not required to comply with subdivision (a).

(d) Transport vehicles may exceed the 45 degree Fahrenheit maximum temperature required pursuant to subdivision (a) when eggs are either being loaded into the transport vehicle or unloaded from the transport vehicle. A transport vehicle shall be deemed to be in compliance with subdivision (a) if the transport vehicle is equipped and has in operation when eggs are in the transport vehicle a refrigeration unit delivering air at a temperature of 45 degrees Fahrenheit or lower.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 580, Sec. 1.   (AB 1990)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

27644.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), it is unlawful for an egg handler, as defined in Section 27510, to sell, offer for sale, or expose for sale eggs that are packed or graded for human consumption unless at least one of the following conditions is met:

(1) The consumer container is plainly, legibly, and conspicuously labeled “KEEP REFRIGERATED” or with words of similar meaning. Consumer container labeling that complies with the safe-handling instructions required by Section 101.17 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations shall be deemed to comply with this paragraph.

(2) A conspicuous sign is posted at the
 point of sale for eggs on bulk display advising consumers that the eggs are to be refrigerated as soon as practical after purchase.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), it is unlawful for an egg handler to sell, offer for sale, or expose for sale eggs that are packed for human consumption unless each container intended for sale to the ultimate consumer is labeled on one outside top, side, or end with all of the following:

(1) (A) The words “Sell-by” immediately followed by the month and day in bold type, for example “June 30” or “6-30.” Common abbreviations of months shall be permitted.

(B) The sell-by date shall not exceed 30 days from the date on which the eggs were packed, excluding the date of packing.

(C) If the eggs are
 repacked but not regraded, the original sell-by date shall apply.

(2) A Julian pack date. As used in this paragraph, the Julian pack date is the consecutive day of the year on which the eggs were packed.

(3) The identification number of the plant of origin.

(c) This section does not apply to eggs that are packaged for export. Paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) does not apply to eggs that are packaged for interstate commerce or eggs that are packaged for military sales. This section does not apply to pasteurized in-shell eggs.

(d) All eggs returned from grocery stores, store warehouses, and institutions shall not be reprocessed for retail shell egg sales.

(e) (1) For
 purposes of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), the department, in consultation with the Shell Egg Advisory Committee, shall establish a plant identification numbering system and assign identification numbers to all egg handling facilities.

(2) For purposes of complying with paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), an egg handling facility that is inspected by the United States Department of Agriculture, and to which a federal plant identification number has been assigned, may use the federal identification number, the identification number assigned by the department, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 11, Sec. 4.   (AB 1414)   Effective April 17, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

27644.5.

(a) It is unlawful for an egg handler, as defined in Section 27510, to sell, offer for sale, or expose for sale pasteurized in-shell eggs that are packed for human consumption unless both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The consumer container is conspicuously labeled “KEEP REFRIGERATED” or with words of similar meaning. Consumer container labeling that complies with the safe handling instructions required by Section 101.17 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations shall be deemed to comply with this paragraph.

(2) A conspicuous sign is posted at the point of sale for
 pasteurized in-shell eggs on bulk display advising consumers that the pasteurized in-shell eggs are to be refrigerated as soon as practical after purchase.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), it is unlawful for an egg handler to sell, offer for sale, or expose for sale pasteurized in-shell eggs that are packed for human consumption unless each container intended for sale to the ultimate consumer is labeled on one outside top, side, or end with all of the following:

(1) The words “Sell by” immediately followed by the month and day in bold type. Common abbreviations for months may be used.

(A) The sell-by date shall not exceed 75 days from the date on which the pasteurized in-shell eggs were pasteurized, excluding the date of
 pasteurization. Processors of in-shell eggs that subject the eggs to the pasteurization process shall establish a sell-by date by completion of an appropriate shelf stability study that includes public health and safety criteria. The processor shall retain the study on file at the processing plant and make it available to the department or the State Department of Public Health upon request.

(B) If the pasteurized in-shell eggs are repacked, the original sell-by date shall apply.

(2) A Julian pack date. As used in this paragraph, the Julian pack date is the consecutive day of the year on which the pasteurized in-shell eggs were pasteurized.

(3) The identification number of the plant of origin.

(4) A conspicuous identification of the eggs as “pasteurized.”

(5) All state and federal labeling requirements.

(c) This section does not apply to pasteurized in-shell eggs that are packaged for export.

(d) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) does not apply to pasteurized in-shell eggs that are packaged for interstate commerce or pasteurized in-shell eggs that are packaged for military sales if exported to a state or federal agency that requires a different format for the sell-by or best-if-used-by date on pasteurized in-shell eggs, and the processor is utilizing that format.

(e) All pasteurized in-shell eggs returned from grocery stores, store warehouses, and institutions shall not be reprocessed for any retail in-shell egg sales.

(f) (1)   The department, in consultation with the Shell Egg Advisory Committee, established pursuant Section 27571, shall establish a plant identification numbering system and assign identification numbers to all pasteurized in-shell egg handling facilities.

(2) For purposes of complying with paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), a pasteurized in-shell egg handling facility that is inspected by the United States Department of Agriculture or the federal Food and Drug Administration, and to which a federal plant identification number has been assigned, may use the federal identification number, the identification number assigned by the department, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 11, Sec. 5.   (AB 1414)   Effective April 17, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Ungraded Eggs [27651. - 27652.]

27651.

It is unlawful for any person to sell to any retailer, consumer, or institution consumer, any eggs which are ungraded as to quality and size, except that the director, upon the written application of any producer, may find and proclaim that an emergency exists which prevents the normal marketing of eggs by the applicant and other producers in the same area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27652.

During an emergency which is proclaimed pursuant to Section 27651, producers in the area in which the emergency has been proclaimed to exist may sell to any retailer, consumer, or institution consumer, eggs which were produced upon the premises of the producers which are ungraded as to size and quality, and any retailer may sell such eggs to any consumer or institution consumer. Each container of eggs which is so sold and all invoices which relate to the eggs shall both:

(a) Be clearly marked “emergency, ungraded.”

(b) Bear the name and address of the producer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Registered Brands [27661. - 27669.]

27661.

Every egg handler shall register with the director each brand name which is intended for use by the handler on a master container of eggs, other than a container made of corrugated fiber.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 507, Sec. 14.   Effective August 13, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

27662.

It is unlawful for a brand registrant or his authorized agent or employees to pack eggs into a master container which does not bear the registrant’s brand, or to transport or sell eggs in such container.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 550.)
-------------------------------------------

27663.

Any person who, without prior authorization, acquires possession of a master container which bears a brand belonging to someone else, shall, at his or her own expense, return the container to the registered owner within 30 days. This section does not apply to the operator of a retail store who is not otherwise an egg handler.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 507, Sec. 15.   Effective August 13, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

27664.

Every person who operates a container exchange business for master containers of eggs shall obtain a license from the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 550.)
-------------------------------------------

27665.

The director shall issue licenses to persons engaged in the container exchange business for master containers of eggs pursuant to such regulations as the director deems necessary to protect the shell egg industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 550.)
-------------------------------------------

27666.

Every licensee shall file with the director the name and address of each person or firm that has contracted to use the exchange services, and shall return all containers bearing a registered brand to the registered owner within 30 days after receipt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 550.)
-------------------------------------------

27667.

A licensee may sell containers which do not have a registered brand, and the ownership of which cannot be determined, to egg handlers. The handlers shall apply a registered brand before use. The licensee shall keep a record of each sale for a period of two years. All records required to be maintained by a licensee shall be made available to the director upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 507, Sec. 16.   Effective August 13, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

27668.

The director may suspend or revoke any license for failure to comply with the provisions of Sections 27664, 27666, or 27667 or regulations adopted by the director relating to activities which must be licensed pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 550.)
-------------------------------------------

27669.

It is unlawful for any common carrier or private carrier for hire, except those which are engaged in transporting eggs and containers of eggs to and from farms where eggs are produced, to receive or transport any container which is marked with a brand that is registered pursuant to this chapter or regulation unless such carrier has in its possession a bill of lading or invoice which shows all of the following:

(a) The name and address of the consignor.

(b) The name and address of the consignee.

(c) The number of containers.

(d) The brand which appears on the containers.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 27661 by Stats. 1980, Ch. 550.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Criminal Punishment and Procedure [27671. - 27690.]

27671.

(a) The following persons are guilty of a misdemeanor:

(1) Any person who violates Section 27632, 27638, 27639, 27640, or 27672.

(2) Any person who commits a second or subsequent violation of this chapter, or any regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter, that is the same as a prior violation.

(3) Any person whose intentional violation of this chapter, or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, resulted, or reasonably could have resulted, in the creation of a hazard to human health or the environment, or in the disruption of the marketing of eggs.

(b) Any person guilty of a misdemeanor as provided in this section is punishable as follows:

(1) In any case of willful or intentional violation, by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six months, or by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both.

(2) In any case which does not involve willful or intentional violation, by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Any prosecution for a violation of this chapter or any regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter may be instituted in any county where any part of the offense occurred. Any evidence which is taken by any enforcement officer in any county may be admitted in evidence in any prosecution in any other county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 750, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

27672.

It is unlawful for any person to fail to appear in court at the time and place designated in any written promise to appear given after arrest pursuant to this chapter or any regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter, regardless of the disposition of the offense originally charged.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27673.

Unless a person who is arrested for the transportation of eggs in violation of any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter demands the right of an immediate appearance before a magistrate, the procedures as prescribed in Chapter 5C (commencing with Section 853.6) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code shall be followed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27680.

If the grade determination and size determination required by this chapter are performed at a location outside of this state, the records relating to eggs of any person registered under this chapter at that location shall be subject to inspection by the department as the department considers necessary. The department may contract with another agency of state government or with a state department of agriculture or other similar agency where the out-of-state registrant is domiciled to conduct the inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 119.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

27681.

A registrant whose out-of-state location is inspected shall reimburse the department for actual and necessary expenses incurred during the inspection. If an out-of-state registrant fails to pay the expenses before the 11th day on which the registrant received an invoice from the department, the department may do any of the following:

(a) Automatically cancel the person’s registration.

(b) Deny a registration to any person who is connected with a person whose registration is canceled because of a violation of this section.

(c) Issue an order to stop the sale of all eggs shipped into California from the registrant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 120.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

27682.

The actual and necessary expenses of the department for each inspection of an out-of-state location may not exceed either of the following:

(a) The actual and necessary expenses, not to exceed the state’s per diem, for food, lodging, and local transportation of the inspector and the cost of the least expensive available space round-trip airfare from Sacramento to the location to be inspected.

(b) Any contract fees charged to perform the inspection by another state agency or an agricultural agency in the state where the registrant is domiciled.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 283, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

27683.

The department shall attempt to schedule as many out-of-state inspections as feasible within an area on each inspection trip. If more than one registrant is inspected in an area during an inspection trip, the expenses of the trip shall be divided proportionately among the registrants based upon the amount of time spent on each registrant’s audit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 283, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

27684.

The department shall perform sufficient inspections of the records of out-of-state registrants to ensure that out-of-state registrants selling eggs into California pay the appropriate fees as required by Section 27551.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 283, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

27685.

Before receiving a registration as required by this chapter, an applicant whose home office or principal place of business is outside of this state shall file with the department the name of an agent in this state who is authorized to receive service of process in actions by the state or the department in the enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 283, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

27686.

All shipped eggs shall be transported under refrigeration in compliance with California statutes and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 121.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

27687.

(a) If the department determines that eggs are not in compliance with this chapter or that they have been shipped without the handler or producer first securing the required registration and being current on the payment of the appropriate fees, the department shall issue and enforce an order to stop the sale of the eggs.

(b) A person may not sell eggs on which a stop-sale order has been issued until the department determines that the eggs and the handler or producer are in compliance with this chapter. Eggs that are in compliance with this chapter, but for which the handler or producer have not secured the required registration and paid the appropriate fees, may only be sold or moved under the specific direction of the secretary.

(c) With respect to eggs that are not in compliance with this chapter and on which a stop-sale order has been issued, the seller may submit the eggs for reinspection to an authorized state or county enforcement officer. If on reinspection the eggs fail to meet the specification of the grades with which they are labeled, the seller must remark or repackage the eggs to meet the specifications for their actual grades before calling for reinspection. Repackaged eggs must be labeled with the original sell by date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 283, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

27688.

Each registrant shall submit a report as designated by the department and remit any fees due on a monthly basis. The report is due no later than the 30th day following the month of delivery to California. Each registrant shall keep a copy of this report on file at the registered facility for a period of three years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 283, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

27688.5.

Any out-of-state registrant who fails to promptly submit required reports or pay required fees is subject to the criminal penalties specified in this chapter. A violation of this section is also subject to a civil or administrative penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per violation. Each day a violation continues may be considered a separate violation for purposes of penalty assessment. The department may also seek appropriate injunctive relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 283, Sec. 14.5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

27689.

The report required by Section 27688 shall give a complete breakdown of all sales of graded and ungraded eggs into California, listing the individual plant or person to whom eggs were sold and indicating whether these eggs were sold on a graded or ungraded basis. A check or money order in the amount of the fee as required by this chapter on all eggs shipped into California on a graded basis shall accompany the report.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 283, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

27690.

All brokers registered with California shall itemize in their reports a true and complete list of all eggs brokered into and within California. This list shall include the name and address of all persons from whom eggs were purchased, to whom they were sold, and the amount of eggs involved in each transaction. Furthermore, the broker shall indicate whether the eggs involved in the transaction were graded or ungraded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 122.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 13. BEE MANAGEMENT AND HONEY PRODUCTION [29000. - 29812.]



CHAPTER 1. Bees [29000. - 29322.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [29000. - 29013.]

29000.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:

A healthy and vibrant apiary industry is important to the economy and welfare of the people of the State of California. Protection and promotion of this important industry is in the interest of the people of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29001.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as, the “Apiary Protection Act.” Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29002.

“Apiary” includes bees, comb, hives, appliances, or colonies, wherever they are kept, located, or found.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29003.

“Appliance” means any implement or other device which is used in handling and manipulating bees or comb, any container of bees or comb, or any other equipment which is used in the practice of apiculture.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29004.

“Bees” means honey-producing insects of the genus Apis. It includes all life stages of these insects.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29005.

“Board” means the Apiary Board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29005.5.

“Broker” means a person or entity that receives a monetary profit from the managing of beehives, hive equipment, or honey bees that they do not own, but have control of, through a private or public agreement between one or more parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 1.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29006.

“Colony” means one hive and its contents, including bees, comb, and appliances.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29007.

“Comb” includes all materials which are normally deposited into hives by bees. It does not include extracted honey or royal jelly, trapped pollen, and processed beeswax.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29008.

“Commissioner” means a county agricultural commissioner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29009.

“Pest” includes American foulbrood or any other infectious disease, parasite, pest, or hereditary disease that affects bees that the secretary declares by regulations, in consultation with the association representing the beekeeping industry and the board and final approval by the secretary, is detrimental to the welfare of the bee industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 2.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29010.

“Infected,” “infested,” “contaminated,” or “diseased” includes a viable stage of a life cycle of a “pest” as defined in Section 29009 can be demonstrated to exist on or within the colony population or on hives, comb, or any appliances associated with beekeeping operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 3.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29011.

“Hive” means any receptacle or container, or part of any receptacle or container, which is made or prepared for the use of bees, or which is inhabited by bees.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29012.

“Inspector” means any person who has received a certificate issued by the department with curriculum approved by the secretary and who is authorized to enforce this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 4.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29013.

“Location” means any premises upon which an apiary is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Apiary Board [29020. - 29028.]

29020.

There is in the department the Apiary Board, consisting of seven members appointed by the secretary, six of whom shall be registered beekeepers who reside in California and who are representative of the industry functions of queen breeding, pollination, or honey production. The secretary may appoint the seventh member of the board, who shall be a public member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 5.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29021.

Upon the director’s request, the board shall submit to the director the names of three or more natural persons, each of whom shall be a citizen and resident of this state and not a producer, shipper, distributor, packer, or processor, nor financially interested in any of those entities, for appointment by the director as a public member of the board. The director may appoint one of the nominees as the public member on the board. If all nominees are unsatisfactory to the director, the board shall continue to submit lists of nominees until the director has made a selection. Any vacancy in the office of the public member of the board shall be filled by appointment by the director from the nominee or nominees similarly qualified submitted by the board. The public member of the board shall represent the interests of the general public in all matters coming before the board and shall have the same voting and other rights and immunities as other members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29022.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that beekeepers appointed to the board are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular agricultural industry concerned, and that the representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are appointed to the board, the particular agricultural industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29023.

In making his or her selection of the membership of the board, the director shall take into consideration the recommendations of the beekeeping industry, including, but not limited to, the California State Beekeeper’s Association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29024.

The term of office of the members of the board is four years. Appointments shall be for full four-year terms. The director shall solicit the views of the industry, including, but not limited to, the California State Beekeeper’s Association before allowing any member to serve as a member of the board; however, no person shall serve successive terms as a member of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29025.

The secretary may appoint a department representative as the secretary to the board. In consultation with the board, the secretary may identify a representative from the California Agricultural Commissioners and Sealers Association and a member of the industry that represents pollinated crops to serve as subject matter experts at meetings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 6.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29026.

The board shall be advisory to the director on all matters related to the beekeeping industry and may make recommendations on all matters affecting the activities of the department in relation to the beekeeping industry including an annual review of the department’s apiary program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29027.

The board shall meet at the call of the director or at the request of any three members of the board. It shall meet at least once a year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29028.

Each member of the board shall serve without compensation, but each member shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in attending meetings of the board and any other official duty authorized by the board and approved by the director. The reimbursements shall be made in accordance with the rules of the Department of Human Resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 22.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Apiary Assessments [29030.5. - 29032.]

29030.5.

The beekeeper, apiary owner, apiary operator, or the person in possession of an apiary, in addition to the annual assessment fee prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 29030, shall pay to the director an annual assessment fee of three cents ($0.03) per colony for the purpose of research on Africanized bees. The fee shall be annually collected until July 1, 1992, and the revenue, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, is continuously appropriated for that research.

Subdivision (c) of Section 29030 and Section 29032 does not apply to the disposition of funds authorized by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29031.

The assessment fees shall be payable to the director on July 1 of each year. The director shall send a written notice of the nonpayment of the required assessment fee to any person who fails to pay the assessment fee on that date. If the total amount of the assessment fee is not paid within 31 days after receipt of the written notice from the director, the person shall be required to pay, in addition to his or her regular fee, a penalty fee equal to 10 percent of the amount of the assessment fee prescribed pursuant to Section 29030, plus interest from that date. The interest shall accrue on a daily basis until the amount owed is paid.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29032.

(a) Any funds collected by the director pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund to be used for the control of pests, and research related to the bee industry, as advised by the board and approved by the director, and to carry out Article 2 (commencing with Section 29020).

(b) The director shall pay by contract entered into pursuant to this section, five-eighths of the funds received from apiary assessments to the counties as reimbursement for costs incurred by the commissioner in the administration and enforcement of this chapter. The payment shall be apportioned to the commissioner in relation to each county’s expenditure for the administration and enforcement of the chapter. The director, after consulting with the board, shall establish standards of performance for administration and enforcement. The director shall make the payments to each county only if the commissioner acts in compliance with a contract entered into between the director and the commissioner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Registration and Identification of Apiaries [29040. - 29057.]

29040.

Every person that is the owner, broker, or is in possession of an apiary that is located within the state, on the first day of January of each year, shall register the number of colonies in each apiary that is owned or possessed by the person and the location of each apiary. Every person required to register under this article, shall do so on the first day of January of each year in which they maintain, possess, or are in possession of an apiary, or within 30 days thereafter, as prescribed in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 7.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29041.

Notwithstanding the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), any information provided in accordance with this article, Section 29070, or Section 29070.5 shall be held confidential, and shall not be disclosed to any person or governmental agency, other than the department or a county department of agriculture. The information shall also be considered privileged under the provisions of Sections 1040 and 1060 of the Evidence Code, with the exception of the location of apiaries for disclosure to pesticide applicators pursuant to Section 29101.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 125.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

29042.

Every person who moves bees into the state or otherwise comes into possession of an apiary that is located within the state after the first day of January, shall register the name of the owner and the number and location of colonies moved into the state or so acquired within 30 days after coming into possession of the apiary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 320, Sec. 1.   (AB 2468)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

29043.

Registration of an apiary shall be filed with the commissioner of the county in which the apiary is located, or with the director if there is no commissioner in the county. The director shall adopt a form of registration to be used statewide, which shall include a request for notification of use of pesticide in accordance with Section 29101. All commissioners shall use the same form.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29044.

(a) Each beekeeper, apiary owner, apiary operator, broker, or person in possession of any apiary, shall pay, in addition to any other fees imposed under this chapter, an annual registration fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) to the
 secretary on January 1 of each year, to cover the cost of apiary registration. The secretary shall by regulation adopt and periodically update a schedule of the registration fees that shall include late fees for anyone who fails to register an apiary under Sections 29041 and 29042. The board of supervisors of any
 county, with the approval of the secretary, may waive the registration fee for any beekeeper, apiary owner, apiary operator, or person, who is a hobbyist not in the business of beekeeping and who possesses nine or fewer colonies.

(b) The secretary may enter into contracts with counties to reimburse the counties for costs incurred by the commissioner in the administration and enforcement of this chapter. The source for reimbursement shall be the funds received from the registration fees described in subdivision (a). The reimbursement shall be apportioned to the commissioner in relation to each county’s expenditure. The secretary shall make the payments to each county only if the commissioner acts in compliance with the contract entered into pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) The secretary, after consulting with the board, shall establish standards of performance for administration and enforcement.

(d) For purposes of this section, “broker” means a person or entity that receives a monetary profit from the managing of beehives, hive equipment, or honeybees that they do not own, but have control of, through a private or public agreement between one or more parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 60, Sec. 22.   (AB 203)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

29045.

It is unlawful for a person to maintain any apiary that is not registered pursuant to this article. Each registration is valid until January 1 of the following year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 320, Sec. 2.   (AB 2468)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

29046.

(a) No person shall maintain an apiary on premises other than that of his or her residence unless the apiary is identified as follows:

(1) By a sign that is prominently displayed on the entrance side of the apiary or stenciled on the hive, that states in dark letters not less than one inch in height on a background of contrasting color, the name of the owner or person responsible for the apiary, his or her address and telephone number, or if he or she has no telephone, a statement to that effect.

(2) If the governing body of the county or city in which the apiary is located has
 provided by ordinance for the identification of apiaries, in the manner that is prescribed in the ordinance.

(b) No person shall locate or maintain an apiary on private land not owned or leased by the person unless the person has approval from the owner of record, or an authorized agent of the owner of record, and can establish approval upon demand of the secretary or commissioner. The approval shall include the name and phone number of the person granting approval.
